Florida, session 2026, HB889.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
33
34 Section 1. Section 11.92, Florida Statutes, is created to
35 read:
36 11.92 Office of the Corrections Ombudsman.—
37 (1) The Legislature finds that the protection of the
38 health, safety, welfare, and rights of persons who are
39 incarcerated within the state correctional system is a matter of
40 urgent public concern. Current law does not provide adequate and
41 independent oversight of the Department of Corrections to ensure
42 accountability, monitor conditions of confinement, and
43 investigate complaints. It is appropriate and necessary to
44 create an independent entity as unit of the legislative branch
45 of state government in order to restore public trust in the
46 department.
47 (2) As used in this section, the term:
48 (a) "Committee" means the Corrections Oversight Committee.
49 (b) "Correctional facility" means a state correctional
50 institution or contractor-operated correctional facility.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb889-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 889 2026
51 (c) "Department" means the Department of Corrections.
52 (d) "Office" means the Office of the Corrections
53 Ombudsman.
54 (e) "Ombudsman" means the Corrections Ombudsman.
55 (3) The Office of the Corrections Ombudsman is created as a
56 unit of the legislative branch of state government. The office
57 is independent of the Department of Corrections and reports
58 directly to the Legislature. The office shall be headed by the
59 Corrections Ombudsman. The office may hire staff and use
60 volunteers as necessary to perform its duties. The office shall
61 do all of the following:
62 (a) Receive, track, investigate, and attempt to resolve
63 complaints concerning correctional facilities made by or on
64 behalf of incarcerated persons, supporters of incarcerated
65 persons, and the public.
66 (b) Monitor and evaluate the conditions of confinement and
67 the treatment of incarcerated persons in correctional
68 facilities. The office may inspect such facilities at any time,
69 but must inspect each facility at least once each year.
70 (c) Collect and analyze data relating to serious
71 incidents, violence, and deaths that occur in correctional
72 facilities.
73 (d) Make recommendations to the department and Legislature
74 which identify solutions to systemic problems, policy changes,
75 or corrective actions necessary to protect the health, safety,
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb889-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 889 2026
76 welfare, and rights of incarcerated persons.
77 (e) Provide information, as appropriate, to incarcerated
78 persons, supporters of incarcerated persons, and the public
79 about the rights of incarcerated persons and the services of the
80 office.
81 (4) The Legislature shall appoint the Ombudsman to a 5-
82 year term by a majority vote and may only remove the Ombudsman
83 by a majority vote. The Ombudsman may be reappointed for a 5-
84 year term. The Ombudsman:
85 (a) Must have knowledge and experience in corrections and
86 human rights.
87 (b) May not have worked for the department in the 10 years
88 preceding his or her appointment.
89 (c) May not have a family member who has worked for the
90 department in the 10 years preceding his or her appointment.
91 (5)(a) On or before January 1, 2027, the Legislature shall
92 establish a Corrections Oversight Committee composed of 15
93 voting members. The committee shall meet quarterly to advise,
94 assist, and provide guidance to the Ombudsman; however, the
95 Ombudsman is not required to accept such advice, assistance, or
96 guidance.
97 (b) Four members of the Legislature shall be appointed to
98 the committee. The Senate Committee on Rules shall appoint two
99 members of the Senate who are not members of the same political
100 party and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb889-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 889 2026
101 appoint two members of the House of Representatives who are not
102 members of the same political party.
103 (c) The legislative members appointed pursuant to
104 paragraph (b) shall appoint the remaining 11 members of the
105 committee and must include at least one:
106 1. Licensed physician.
107 2. Licensed mental or behavioral health professional.
108 3. Educator.
109 4. Member of the clergy.
110 5. Former administrative employee of the department.
111 6. Man who is a citizen of the United States and was
112 formerly incarcerated in a correctional facility for a term of
113 imprisonment of 3 or more years within the 10 years preceding
114 his appointment.
115 7. Woman who is a citizen of the United States and was
116 formerly incarcerated in a correctional facility for a term of
117 imprisonment of 3 or more years within the 10 years preceding
118 her appointment.
119 8. Family member of a person who is incarcerated in a
120 correctional facility at the time of the family member's
121 appointment.
122 9. Representative of a nonprofit prisoner advocacy group.
123 10. Person with a background in data analysis.
124 11. Person with experience in inmate reentry services.
125 (d) Each committee member shall be appointed to a 3-year
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb889-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 889 2026
126 term. However, for the purpose of achieving staggered terms, the
127 members initially appointed under subparagraphs (c)6.-11. shall
128 each serve a 2-year term. All subsequent appointments shall be
129 for 3-year terms. Any vacancy must be filled in the same manner
130 as the original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired
131 term.
132 (6) The department shall provide the Ombudsman and
133 committee members with immediate access to correctional
134 facilities, staff members of such facilities, persons
135 incarcerated in such facilities, and records of such facilities
136 which the Ombudsman or committee members determine are needed to
137 carry out the duties of the office. The Ombudsman and committee
138 members may access any correctional facility at any time,
139 unannounced, and speak confidentially with any incarcerated
140 person or staff member.
141 (7) Written correspondence between an incarcerated person
142 and the office, including the Ombudsman or a committee member,
143 is privileged mail under rule 33-210.103, Florida Administrative
144 Code.
145 (8) The decision, or failure, to file a complaint with the
146 office does not impact the inmate grievance procedure
147 established under s. 944.331.
148 (9) The office is not required to investigate every
149 complaint or process complaints in the order received.
150 (10) Beginning December 1, 2027, the office shall submit
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb889-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 889 2026
151 an annual report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker
152 of the House of Representatives which summarizes the activities,
153 findings, and recommendations of the office.
154 Section 2. For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of
155 $250,000 in recurring funds is appropriated from the General
156 Revenue Fund to the Office of the Corrections Ombudsman for the
157 purposes of implementing and administering this act.
158 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb889-00